dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- ঔপনিবেশিক; ঔপনিবেশিক -->
    <pardef n="ঔপনিবেশিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বঞ্চিত; বঞ্চিত -->
    <pardef n="বঞ্চিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিয়মিত; নিয়মিত -->
    <pardef n="নিয়মিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অঘোষিত; অঘোষিত -->
    <pardef n="অঘোষিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অসম্ভব; অসম্ভব -->
    <pardef n="অসম্ভব__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নির্দিষ্ট; নির্দিষ্ট -->
    <pardef n="নির্দিষ্ট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সশস্ত্র; সশস্ত্র -->
    <pardef n="সশস্ত্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ইহুদি; ইহুদি -->
    <pardef n="ইহুদি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সর্বনাশা; সর্বনাশা -->
    <pardef n="সর্বনাশা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিস্মিত; বিস্মিত -->
    <pardef n="বিস্মিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দূষিত; দূষিত -->
    <pardef n="দূষিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বর্তমান; বর্তমান -->
    <pardef n="বর্তমান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রতারক; প্রতারক -->
    <pardef n="প্রতারক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিকট; নিকট -->
    <pardef n="নিকট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রবলতর; প্রবল -->
    <pardef n="প্রবল/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সম্মিলিত; সম্মিলিত -->
    <pardef n="সম্মিলিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুবিধাবঞ্চিত; সুবিধাবঞ্চিত -->
    <pardef n="সুবিধাবঞ্চিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দোষী; দোষী -->
    <pardef n="দোষী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অন্তর্বর্তীকালীন; অন্তর্বর্তীকালীন -->
    <pardef n="অন্তর্বর্তীকালীন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিরলতম; বিরল -->
    <pardef n="বিরল/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চালানো; চালানো -->
    <pardef n="চালানো__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চলমান; চলমান -->
    <pardef n="চলমান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রবলতম; প্রবল -->
    <pardef n="প্রবল/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ভাঙা; ভাঙা -->
    <pardef n="ভাঙা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ১০ম; ১০ম -->
    <pardef n="১০ম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কুখ্যাত; কুখ্যাত -->
    <pardef n="কুখ্যাত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উপযুক্ত; উপযুক্ত -->
    <pardef n="উপযুক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কাঁচা; কাঁচা -->
    <pardef n="কাঁচা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তুচ্ছ; তুচ্ছ -->
    <pardef n="তুচ্ছ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- খ্যাতিমান; খ্যাতিমান -->
    <pardef n="খ্যাতিমান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- যেমন; যেমন -->
    <pardef n="যেমন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশদ; বিশদ -->
    <pardef n="বিশদ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আবশ্যিক; আবশ্যিক -->
    <pardef n="আবশ্যিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শীর্ষতর; শীর্ষ -->
    <pardef n="শীর্ষ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পরিবেশিত; পরিবেশিত -->
    <pardef n="পরিবেশিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কুমারী; কুমারী -->
    <pardef n="কুমারী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিপরীত; বিপরীত -->
    <pardef n="বিপরীত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আইরিশ; আইরিশ -->
    <pardef n="আইরিশ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুপ্ত; সুপ্ত -->
    <pardef n="সুপ্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বেআইনি; বেআইনি -->
    <pardef n="বেআইনি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উচ্চ; উচ্চ -->
    <pardef n="উচ্চ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মিশ্র; মিশ্র -->
    <pardef n="মিশ্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মাতাল; মাতাল -->
    <pardef n="মাতাল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অব্যাহত; অব্যাহত -->
    <pardef n="অব্যাহত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ঔপনিবেশিক"><i>ঔপনিবেশিক</i><par n="ঔপনিবেশিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বঞ্চিত"><i>বঞ্চিত</i><par n="বঞ্চিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিয়মিত"><i>নিয়মিত</i><par n="নিয়মিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অঘোষিত"><i>অঘোষিত</i><par n="অঘোষিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অসম্ভব"><i>অসম্ভব</i><par n="অসম্ভব__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্দিষ্ট"><i>নির্দিষ্ট</i><par n="নির্দিষ্ট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সশস্ত্র"><i>সশস্ত্র</i><par n="সশস্ত্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ইহুদি"><i>ইহুদি</i><par n="ইহুদি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সর্বনাশা"><i>সর্বনাশা</i><par n="সর্বনাশা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিস্মিত"><i>বিস্মিত</i><par n="বিস্মিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দূষিত"><i>দূষিত</i><par n="দূষিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বর্তমান"><i>বর্তমান</i><par n="বর্তমান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতারক"><i>প্রতারক</i><par n="প্রতারক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিকট"><i>নিকট</i><par n="নিকট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রবলতর"><i>প্রবল</i><par n="প্রবল/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্মিলিত"><i>সম্মিলিত</i><par n="সম্মিলিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুবিধাবঞ্চিত"><i>সুবিধাবঞ্চিত</i><par n="সুবিধাবঞ্চিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দোষী"><i>দোষী</i><par n="দোষী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্তর্বর্তীকালীন"><i>অন্তর্বর্তীকালীন</i><par n="অন্তর্বর্তীকালীন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরলতম"><i>বিরল</i><par n="বিরল/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চালানো"><i>চালানো</i><par n="চালানো__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চলমান"><i>চলমান</i><par n="চলমান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রবলতম"><i>প্রবল</i><par n="প্রবল/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাঙা"><i>ভাঙা</i><par n="ভাঙা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="১০ম"><i>১০ম</i><par n="১০ম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কুখ্যাত"><i>কুখ্যাত</i><par n="কুখ্যাত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উপযুক্ত"><i>উপযুক্ত</i><par n="উপযুক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কাঁচা"><i>কাঁচা</i><par n="কাঁচা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তুচ্ছ"><i>তুচ্ছ</i><par n="তুচ্ছ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="খ্যাতিমান"><i>খ্যাতিমান</i><par n="খ্যাতিমান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যেমন"><i>যেমন</i><par n="যেমন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশদ"><i>বিশদ</i><par n="বিশদ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আবশ্যিক"><i>আবশ্যিক</i><par n="আবশ্যিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শীর্ষতর"><i>শীর্ষ</i><par n="শীর্ষ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিবেশিত"><i>পরিবেশিত</i><par n="পরিবেশিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কুমারী"><i>কুমারী</i><par n="কুমারী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিপরীত"><i>বিপরীত</i><par n="বিপরীত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আইরিশ"><i>আইরিশ</i><par n="আইরিশ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুপ্ত"><i>সুপ্ত</i><par n="সুপ্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বেআইনি"><i>বেআইনি</i><par n="বেআইনি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উচ্চ"><i>উচ্চ</i><par n="উচ্চ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মিশ্র"><i>মিশ্র</i><par n="মিশ্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মাতাল"><i>মাতাল</i><par n="মাতাল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অব্যাহত"><i>অব্যাহত</i><par n="অব্যাহত__adj"/></e>
